Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-12,109
Innovation hub areas; department designate innovation hubs.

The department shall designate innovation hubs within iHub areas to stimulate partnerships, economic development, and job creation by leveraging iHub partner assets to provide an innovation platform for startup businesses, economic development organizations, business groups, and venture capitalists. The iHub partner assets may include, but are not limited to, research parks, technology incubators, universities, and federal laboratories.

Laws 2022, LB450, § 4.